Hawaii statutes.
TITLE 24.
INSURANCE

Chapter

431 Insurance Code

431A Readability of Insurance Contracts--Repealed

431C Life Settlements

431D Insurance Company Insolvency--Repealed

431E Life Settlements--Repealed

431F Hawaii Life and Disability Insurance Guaranty

Association Act--Repealed

431H Insurance Information Protection
Act--Repealed

431J Captive Insurance Companies--Repealed

431K Risk Retention

431L Medicaid-Related Mandates

431M Mental Health and Alcohol and Substance Use
Disorder

Treatment Insurance Benefits

431N State Health Insurance Program Act

431P Hawaii Hurricane Relief Fund

431R Prescription Drug Benefits

432 Benefit Societies

432C Nonprofit Entities; Conversion of Assets

432D Health Maintenance Organization Act

432E Patients' Bill of Rights and Responsibilities
Act

432F Health Care Provider Network Adequacy

432G Dental Insurers

433 Mutual and Fraternal Benefit
Societies--Repealed

434 Insurance by Fraternal Benefit
Societies--Repealed

435 Credit Life Insurance and Credit Disability

Insurance--Repealed

435C Hawaii Medical Malpractice Underwriting Plan

435E Physicians and Surgeons Cooperative Indemnity

435H Hawaii Health Insurance Exchange--Repealed

Cross References

For disposition of repealed provisions, see Insurance Law
Revision reference table (1987) at end of chapter 435.

Service contracts, see chapter 481X.

CHAPTER
431 [OLD]

THE HAWAII INSURANCE LAW

REPEALED. L 1987, c 347, §1.

Cross References

For disposition of repealed provisions, see Insurance Law
Revision reference table (1987) at end of chapter 435.

CHAPTER
431

INSURANCE
CODE

ARTICLE 1.
DEFINITIONS

Part I. General Provisions

Section

431:1-100 Short title

431:1-100.5 Purpose

431:1-101 Compliance required

431:1-102 Public interest

431:1-103 Headings

431:1-104 Particular provisions prevail

431:1-105 Records, statements and reports

Part II. General Definitions

431:1-201 Insurance defined

431:1-202 Insurer defined

431:1-203 Classes of insurance

431:1-204 Life insurance defined

431:1-205 Accident and health or sickness
insurance defined

431:1-206 Property insurance defined

431:1-207 Marine and transportation insurance
defined

431:1-208 Vehicle insurance defined

431:1-209 General casualty insurance defined

431:1-210 Surety insurance defined

431:1-211 Ocean marine insurance defined

431:1-212 Person defined

431:1-213 State defined

431:1-214 United States defined

431:1-215 Transaction of an insurance business

431:1-216 General business practice

431:1-217 Insurance policies issued to
construction

professionals

ARTICLE 2.
ADMINISTRATION OF INSURANCE LAWS

Part I. Insurance Division

431:2-101 Insurance division

431:2-102 Insurance commissioner

431:2-103 Salary

431:2-104 Seal

431:2-105 Deputies, employees

431:2-105.5 Staff

431:2-106 Ethical requirements for insurance
division staff

431:2-107 Workers' compensation rate analysis

431:2-108 Commissioner may delegate

431:2-109 Supplies, convention blanks

431:2-110 Offices

Part II. Powers and Duties of Commissioner

431:2-201 General powers and duties

431:2-201.2 Standards for commissioner

431:2-201.3 Criminal convictions; consent to
engage

in business

431:2-201.5 Conformity to federal law

431:2-201.8 Sales to members of the armed forces

431:2-202 Orders and notices

431:2-202.5 Approval; when deemed effective

431:2-203 Enforcement

431:2-204 Commissioner's power to subpoena

431:2-205 Commissioner to receive service of
legal process

on foreign or alien insurer

431:2-206 How service on commissioner made

431:2-207 Contempt proceedings

431:2-208 Access to records

431:2-209 Records and reports

431:2-210 Copies and certificates as evidence

431:2-211 Annual report

431:2-212 Interstate cooperation

431:2-214 The commissioner's education and training
fund

431:2-215 Deposits to compliance resolution
fund

431:2-216 Assessments of health insurers

Part III. Investigations, Examinations,
Hearings

and Appeals

431:2-301 Purpose

431:2-301.5 Examiner defined

431:2-301.6 Conflict of interest

431:2-301.7 Conduct of examinations

431:2-301.8 Immunity from liability

431:2-302 Authority, scope, and scheduling of
examinations

431:2-303 Examination of producers, adjusters,
promoters,

and independent bill reviewers

431:2-304 Examination of guaranty associations

431:2-305 Examination reports

431:2-306 Examination expense

431:2-307 Repealed

431:2-307.5 Reimbursement and compensation of
examiners;

source of funds; disposition of
receipts

431:2-308 Administrative procedure act applies

Part IV. Insurance Fraud

431:2-401 Definitions

431:2-402 Insurance fraud investigations branch

431:2-403 Insurance fraud

431:2-404 Restitution

431:2-405 Insurance fraud; administrative
penalties

431:2-406 Administrative procedures

431:2-407 Acceptance of payment

431:2-408 Civil cause of action for insurance
fraud;

exemption

431:2-409 Mandatory reporting

431:2-410 Deposit into the compliance
resolution fund

ARTICLE 2D.
MARKET CONDUCT

431:2D-101 Legislative intent

431:2D-102 Definitions

431:2D-103 Domestic responsibility and deference
to other

states

431:2D-104 Market analysis procedures

431:2D-105 Protocols for market conduct actions

431:2D-106 Protocols for market conduct
examinations

431:2D-107 Confidentiality requirements

431:2D-108 Market conduct surveillance personnel

431:2D-109 Immunity for market conduct
surveillance

personnel

431:2D-110 Fines and penalties

431:2D-111 Data collection and participation in
national

market conduct databases

431:2D-112 Coordination with other states
through the

National Association of Insurance
Commissioners

431:2D-113 Additional duties of the commissioner

431:2D-114 Data calls

ARTICLE 3.
INSURERS GENERAL REQUIREMENTS

Part I. Definitions

431:3-101 Alien insurer

431:3-102 Capital funds

431:3-103 Charter

431:3-104 Domestic insurer

431:3-105 Foreign insurer

431:3-106 Mutual insurer

431:3-107 Reciprocal insurance

431:3-108 Reciprocal insurer

431:3-109 Reinsurance

431:3-110 Stock insurer

Part II. Certificate of Authority

431:3-201 Authority required

431:3-202 Insurer's name

431:3-203 Qualifications for authority

431:3-203.5 Foreign insurer; certification

431:3-204 Classes of insurance authorized

431:3-205 Funds required of new insurers

431:3-206 Additional funds required, new
insurers

431:3-207 Noncompliance as to capital stock and
surplus

permitted certain insurers for five
years

431:3-208 Funds required of existing and new
insurers for

transacting additional classes of
insurance

431:3-209 Deposits of alien and foreign
insurers; special

deposits

431:3-210 Determination of capital funds of
alien insurer

431:3-211 Repealed

431:3-212 Application for authority

431:3-212.5 Redomestication of authorized
insurers

431:3-213 Authority issued or denied

431:3-214 Extension; amendment

431:3-215 Withdrawal from State; obligations

431:3-216 Mandatory refusal, suspension or
revocation

provisions

431:3-217 Discretionary refusal, suspension or
revocation

provisions

431:3-218 Procedure upon revocation; suspension
of

certificate of authority

431:3-219 Suspension period; revocation

431:3-220 Revival

431:3-221 Power to fine

Part III. Annual Requirements and Limiting
Provisions

431:3-301 Annual and quarterly filings with
commissioner

431:3-302 Annual and quarterly filings with the
National

Association of Insurance
Commissioners

431:3-302.5 Annual audit

431:3-303 Immunity

431:3-304 Confidentiality

431:3-304.5 Statement of actuarial opinion;
property

and casualty insurance; confidentiality

431:3-305 Accounts; records

431:3-306 Limit of risk

431:3-306.5 Residential hurricane coverage

431:3-307 Free insurance

431:3-308 Alien government owned insurers

431:3-309 Disclosure of profits by insurers

Part IV. Risk-Based Capital for Insurers

431:3-401 Definitions

431:3-402 Risk-based capital reports

431:3-403 Company action level event

431:3-404 Regulatory action level event

431:3-405 Authorized control level event

431:3-406 Mandatory control level event

431:3-407 Hearing

431:3-408 Confidentiality and prohibition on
announcements;

prohibition on use in ratemaking

431:3-409 Supplemental provisions; rules;
exceptions

431:3-410 Foreign insurers

431:3-411 Severability

431:3-412 Notices

431:3-413 Phase-in provision

431:3-414 Immunity

ARTICLE 3A.
PRIVACY OF CONSUMER FINANCIAL INFORMATION

Part I. General Provisions

431:3A-101 Purpose; scope; applicability

431:3A-102 Definitions

Part II. Privacy and Opt Out Notices for
Financial

Information

431:3A-201 Initial privacy notice to consumers
required

431:3A-202 Annual privacy notice to customers
required

431:3A-203 Information to be included in privacy
notices

431:3A-204 Form of opt out notice to consumers
and opt out

methods

431:3A-205 Revised privacy notices

431:3A-206 Delivery

Part III. Limits on Disclosures of
Financial

Information

431:3A-301 Limits on disclosure of nonpublic
personal

financial information to
nonaffiliated third

parties

431:3A-302 Limits on redisclosure and reuse of
nonpublic

personal financial information

431:3A-303 Limits on sharing account number
information for

marketing purposes

Part IV. Exceptions to Limits on
Disclosures of

Financial Information

431:3A-401 Exception to opt out requirements for
disclosure

of nonpublic personal financial
information for

service providers and for joint
marketing

431:3A-402 Exceptions to notice and opt out
requirements

for disclosure of nonpublic personal
financial

information for processing and
servicing

transactions

431:3A-403 Other exceptions to notice and opt
out

requirements for disclosure of
nonpublic

personal financial information

Part V. Additional Provisions

431:3A-501 Protection of Fair Credit Reporting
Act

431:3A-502 Nondiscrimination

431:3A-503 Violation

431:3A-504 Rules

ARTICLE 3D. RISK
MANAGEMENT AND OWN RISK

AND SOLVENCY
ASSESSMENT

431:3D-101 Scope and purpose

431:3D-102 Definitions

431:3D-103 Risk management framework

431:3D-104 Own risk and solvency assessment
requirement

431:3D-105 Own risk and solvency assessment
summary report

431:3D-106 Exemption

431:3D-107 Contents of own risk and solvency
assessment

summary report

431:3D-108 Confidentiality

431:3D-109 Sanctions

431:3D-110 Severability

ARTICLE 4.
DOMESTIC INSURERS

Part I. Organization, Powers and Sale of
Securities

of Domestic Insurers

431:4-101 Definitions

431:4-102 Types of insurers permitted

431:4-103 Corporation law applies in general

431:4-104 Articles of incorporation

431:4-105 Affidavit

431:4-106 Board of directors

431:4-106.5 Membership in mutual or subscriber in

reciprocal insurers; no personal
liability

of representative

431:4-107 Solicitation permit required

431:4-108 Application for a solicitation permit

431:4-109 Permit issued or denied

431:4-110 Bond or cash deposit

431:4-111 Expiration and contents

431:4-112 Permit not an inducement

431:4-113 Organization solicitor's license

431:4-114 Revocation of solicitation permit

431:4-115 Escrow of funds

431:4-116 Expense pending completion

431:4-117 Issuance and forfeiture of securities

431:4-118 Insurance application

431:4-119 Refund upon failure to complete or
qualify or

upon revocation of solicitation
permit

431:4-120 Subsequent financing

431:4-121 False exhibits

431:4-122 Depositaries

431:4-123 Corrupt practices

431:4-124 Prohibited guaranty

431:4-125 Fees on use of funds

431:4-126 Comply with foreign laws

431:4-127 Solicitation in other states

Part II. Domestic Stock Insurers

431:4-201 Other laws applicable

431:4-202 Increase of capital

431:4-203 Decrease of capital

431:4-204 Dividends to stockholders

431:4-205 Illegal dividends; reductions

431:4-206 Repayment of contributed surplus

431:4-207 Participating policies

431:4-208 Statement by beneficial owner,
director,

officer

431:4-209 Recovery of profits realized

431:4-210 Unlawful sales of equity security

431:4-211 Exempt transactions

431:4-212 Arbitrage transactions not affected

431:4-213 Exempt equity securities

431:4-214 Rules and regulations

Part IIA. Proxies, Consents, and
Authorizations

of Domestic Stock Insurers

431:4-231 Applicability

431:4-232 Schedule A: information required in
a

proxy statement

431:4-233 Schedule B: information to be
included in

statements filed by or on behalf of a

participant other than an insurer in
a

proxy solicitation in an election
contest

431:4-234 Proxies, consents, and authorizations

431:4-235 Schedules and exhibits

431:4-236 Disclosure of equivalent information

431:4-237 Definitions

431:4-238 Information to be furnished to
stockholders

431:4-239 Requirements as to proxy

431:4-240 Material required to be filed

431:4-241 False or misleading statements

431:4-242 Prohibition of certain solicitations

431:4-243 Election contests; applicability

431:4-244 Filing of information required by
schedule B

431:4-245 Solicitations prior to furnishing
required

written proxy statement

431:4-246 Solicitation prior to furnishing
required

written proxy statement; filing
requirements

431:4-247 Application of this part to annual
report

Part III. Domestic Mutual Insurers

431:4-301 Other articles applicable

431:4-302 Initial qualifications for mutual
insurers

431:4-303 Mutual property insurer

431:4-304 Mutual casualty insurer

431:4-305 Mutual vehicle insurer

431:4-306 Mutual life insurer

431:4-307 Mutual accident and health or
sickness insurer

431:4-308 Membership

431:4-309 Rights of members

431:4-310 Bylaws

431:4-311 Notice of annual meeting

431:4-312 Members proxies

431:4-313 Directors

431:4-314
Limitation on expenses incurred in writing

property and
casualty

431:4-315 Violation of expense limitation

431:4-316 Actions on officers' salaries

431:4-317 Contingent liability of members

431:4-318 Accrual of liability

431:4-319 Contingent liability as asset

431:4-320 Lien on reserves

431:4-321 Nonassessable policies

431:4-322 Applies to all policies

431:4-323 Revocation of authority

431:4-324 Dividends

431:4-325 Nonparticipating policies

431:4-326 Members' share of assets

Part IV. Reciprocal Insurers

431:4-401 Application of other sections

431:4-402 Scope

431:4-403 Insuring powers of reciprocals

431:4-404 Suits

431:4-405 Attorney

431:4-406 Power of attorney

431:4-407 Modifications

431:4-408 Organization of reciprocal insurers

431:4-409 Application for authority;
declaration required

431:4-410 Policies effective

431:4-411 Attorney's bond

431:4-412 Deposit in lieu

431:4-413 Actions on bond

431:4-414 Subscribers

431:4-415 Subscribers' advisory committee

431:4-416 Subscriber's liability

431:4-417 Subscriber's liability on judgments

431:4-418 Aggregate liability

431:4-419 Assessment

431:4-420 Time limit for assessment

431:4-421 Nonassessable policies

431:4-422 Contributions of surplus

431:4-423 Share in savings

431:4-424 Subscriber's share of assets

431:4-425 Repealed

Part V. Reorganization and Conversion of
Domestic

Insurers

431:4-501 Reorganization, merger or
consolidation

431:4-502 Mutualization of stock insurers

431:4-503 Conversion or reinsurance of mutual
insurer

431:4-504 Merger or conversion of reciprocal
insurer

ARTICLE 4A.
CREDIT FOR REINSURANCE

431:4A-101 Credit allowed a domestic ceding
insurer

431:4A-102 Asset or reduction from liability for

reinsurance ceded by a domestic
insurer to

an assuming insurer

431:4A-103 Qualified United States financial
institutions

431:4A-104 Rules

431:4A-105 Repealed

ARTICLE 4F.
STATE OF ENTRY FOR ALIEN INSURERS

431:4F-101 Definitions

431:4F-102 Scope

431:4F-103 Authorization of entry

431:4F-104 Maintenance of trust account

431:4F-105 Requirements for trust agreement

431:4F-106 Reporting requirements for United States

branches of alien insurers

431:4F-107 Additional requirements for United States

branch license

431:4F-108 Authority of commissioner

ARTICLE 5.
FINANCIAL CONDITION

Part I. Standards

431:5-101 Impairment of capital

431:5-102 Impairment of surplus

431:5-103 Impairment of reciprocal's surplus

Part II. Assets and Liabilities

431:5-201 Qualified assets

431:5-202 Assets not allowed

431:5-203 Liabilities

431:5-204 Determining financial condition of
reciprocal

insurers

Part III. Reserves and Valuation

431:5-301 Unearned premium reserve

431:5-302 Unearned premium reserve for marine
and

transportation

431:5-303 Active life reserves and unearned
premium

reserves for noncancellable
disability

insurance

431:5-304 Loss reserves for liability and
workers'

compensation insurance

431:5-305 Increased reserves

431:5-306 Reserve credit for reinsurance

431:5-307 Standard valuation law; life

431:5-308 Valuation of bonds

431:5-309 Valuation of other securities

431:5-310 Valuation of property

431:5-311 Valuation of purchase money mortgages

Part IV. Rules

431:5-401 Rules

ARTICLE 6.
INVESTMENTS

Part I. General Provisions

431:6-101 Definitions pertaining to investments

431:6-102 Merged, reorganized institutions

431:6-103 Eligible investments; scope

431:6-104 General qualifications

431:6-105 General limitations

431:6-106 Record of investments

Part II. Mandatory Provisions

431:6-201 Required investments for capital and
reserves

Part III. Permitted Investments

431:6-301 Public obligations

431:6-302 Corporate obligations

431:6-303 Preferred or guaranteed stocks or
shares

431:6-304 Trustees or receivers obligations

431:6-305 Equipment trust obligations

431:6-306 Mortgage loans and contracts

431:6-307 Mortgage loan limited by property
value

431:6-308 Encumbrance defined

431:6-309 Appraisal; insurance; limit

431:6-310 Security agreements

431:6-311 Real property owned

431:6-312 Time limit for disposal

431:6-313 Foreign securities

431:6-314 Policy loans

431:6-315 Banks, savings and loan associations,
credit

unions, and financial services loan
companies

431:6-316 Insurance stocks

431:6-317 Common stocks

431:6-318 Collateral loans

431:6-319 Miscellaneous investments

431:6-320 Special consent investments

431:6-321 Hedging transactions

431:6-322 Common trust funds; mutual funds; and
exchange

traded funds

431:6-323 Separate accounts

431:6-324 Subsidiaries

Part IV. Prohibited Investments and
Limitations

431:6-401 Prohibited investments

431:6-402 Securities underwriting; agreements
to

withhold or to repurchase

431:6-403 Disposal of ineligible property and
securities

431:6-404 Authorization of investments

Part V. Investment of Foreign and Alien
Insurers

431:6-501 Investments of foreign, alien
insurers

Part VI. Investment Pools

431:6-601 Insurer investment pools

431:6-602 Securities lending, repurchase,
reverse

repurchase, and dollar roll;
investment pools

ARTICLE 7.
FEES, TAXES AND DEPOSITS

Part I. Fees

431:7-101 Fees

Part II. Taxes

431:7-201 Annual and monthly tax statements

431:7-202 Taxation

431:7-202.5 Additions to taxes for noncompliance
or

evasion; interest on underpayments
and

overpayments

431:7-203 Administrative refunds

431:7-204 In lieu provision

431:7-204.5 Appeals

431:7-204.6 Limitation period for assessment,
levy,

collection, or refund

431:7-205 Reports to department of taxation

431:7-206 Domestic company credit for
retaliatory taxes

paid other states

431:7-207 Tax credit to facilitate regulatory
oversight

431:7-208 Low-income housing, insurance premium

tax credit

431:7-209 High technology business investment
tax credit

Part III. Deposits

431:7-301 Deposits of insurers

431:7-302 Purpose of deposit

431:7-303 Securities eligible for deposit

431:7-304 Record and receipt

431:7-305 Transfer of securities

431:7-306 Director may designate depositary

431:7-307 Responsibility for deposits

431:7-308 Dividends and substitutions

431:7-309 Release of deposit

431:7-310 Voluntary excess deposit

431:7-311 Not subject to levy

ARTICLE 8.
UNAUTHORIZED INSURERS AND SURPLUS LINES

Part I. General Provisions

431:8-101 Scope

431:8-102 Definitions

Part II. Unauthorized Insurers

431:8-201 Transacting insurance business
without

certificate of authority prohibited

431:8-202 Acting for or aiding unauthorized
insurer

prohibited

431:8-203 Validity of contracts illegally
effectuated

431:8-204 Liability of person assisting
unauthorized

insurer

431:8-205 Insurance independently procured;
duty to

report and pay tax

431:8-206 Commissioner may enjoin unauthorized
insurers

431:8-207 Legal process against unauthorized
insurer; how

service of process made

431:8-208 Defense of action by unauthorized
insurer; bond

431:8-209 Attorney's fees

431:8-210 Advertising prohibited

431:8-211 Penalties

Part III. Surplus Lines Insurance

431:8-300 Exemptions from surplus lines law

431:8-301 Insurance placed with unauthorized
insurer

permitted

431:8-302 Surplus lines insurers

431:8-303, 304 Repealed

431:8-305 Evidence of insurance; changes;
penalties

431:8-306 Signature of broker and special
endorsement of

surplus lines policy

431:8-307 Broker's duty to notify insured

431:8-308 Surplus lines insurance valid

431:8-309 Effect of payment to surplus lines
broker

431:8-310 Surplus lines broker license
required;

application and qualifications for
license

431:8-311 Compensation

431:8-312 Records of surplus lines broker

431:8-313 Surplus lines broker's reports to
commissioner

431:8-314 Surplus lines advisory organizations

431:8-315 Tax on surplus lines

431:8-316 Penalty for failure to file statement
or remit

tax

431:8-317 License denial, nonrenewal, suspension,
or

revocation

431:8-318 Examination of surplus lines broker's

accounts and records

431:8-319 Actions against surplus lines
insurer;

service of process

431:8-320 Penalties

431:8-321 Nonresident licensing

431:8-322 Reciprocity

431:8-323 Exemption from examination

431:8-324 Surplus lines broker license
examination

431:8-325 Scope of examination

431:8-326 Time of examinations

431:8-327 Prerequisites for license renewal

431:8-328 Continuing education recordkeeping

431:8-329 Commissioner's authority to grant
waiver

ARTICLE 9.
LICENSING OF ADJUSTERS AND BILL REVIEWERS

Part I. General Provisions

431:9-101 Scope

431:9-102 to 104 Repealed

431:9-105 Definitions

Part II. Licensing Requirements,
Procedures and

Enforcement

431:9-201 License required; exception

431:9-202 Repealed

431:9-203 General qualifications for license

431:9-204 Applications for license

431:9-205 Repealed

431:9-206 Examinations for license

431:9-207 Scope of examination

431:9-208 Time of examinations

431:9-209 Advisory board

431:9-210 to 221 Repealed

431:9-222 Qualification for adjuster's license

431:9-222.5 Claims adjusters; limited license

431:9-223 Public adjuster's bond

431:9-224 Separate licenses

431:9-225 Form of adjusters' license

431:9-226 Powers conferred by an adjuster's
license

431:9-227 Adjuster; restrictions

431:9-228 Place of business

431:9-229 Records of adjuster or independent
bill reviewer

431:9-230 Reporting and accounting for premiums

431:9-231 Repealed

431:9-232 Extension of licenses

431:9-233, 234 Repealed

431:9-234.5 Reporting of actions

431:9-235 Denial, suspension, revocation of
licenses

431:9-235.5 Suspension or denial of license for
noncompliance

with support order

431:9-236 Repealed

431:9-237 Duration of suspension

431:9-238 Power to fine

431:9-239 Reinstatement or relicensing

431:9-240 Fine in lieu

431:9-241 Repealed

431:9-242 Compensation by contingency fee
prohibited

431:9-243 Qualification for independent bill
reviewer's

License

Part III. Continuing Education--Repealed

431:9-301 to 305 Repealed

ARTICLE 9A.
[OLD] MANAGING GENERAL AGENTS--REPEALED

431:9A-101 to 108 Repealed

ARTICLE 9A.
PRODUCER LICENSING

Part I. General Provisions

431:9A-101 Scope

431:9A-102 Definitions

431:9A-103 License required

431:9A-104 Exceptions to licensing

431:9A-105 Insurance producer license
examination

431:9A-106 Application for license

431:9A-107 License

431:9A-107.5 Limited license

431:9A-108 Nonresident licensing

431:9A-108.5 Process against nonresident licensees

431:9A-109 Exemption from examination

431:9A-110 Legal, trade, and assumed names

431:9A-111 Temporary licensing

431:9A-112 License denial, nonrenewal,
suspension, or

revocation

431:9A-112.3 Suspension or denial of license for
noncompliance

with support order

431:9A-112.5 Controlled business

431:9A-113 Commissions

431:9A-114 Appointments

431:9A-115 Notification to commissioner of
termination

431:9A-116 Reciprocity

431:9A-117 Reporting of actions

431:9A-118 Rules

431:9A-119 Scope of examination

431:9A-120 Time of examinations

431:9A-121 Advisory board

431:9A-122 Place of business

431:9A-123 Records of insurance producer

431:9A-123.5 Reporting and accounting for premiums

431:9A-124 Prerequisites for license renewal

431:9A-125 Continuing education recordkeeping

431:9A-126 Power to fine

431:9A-127 Fine in lieu

431:9A-128 Nondiscrimination

431:9A-129 Penalty

431:9A-130 Commissioner's authority to grant
waiver

Part II. Limited Lines Motor Vehicle
Rental Company

Producer

431:9A-141 Definitions

431:9A-142 Requirements for license and renewal

Part III. Continuing Education Course
Providers

431:9A-151 Continuing education course provider
certificate

431:9A-152 Continuing
education course provider additional duties

431:9A-153 Courses

431:9A-154 Self-study courses

431:9A-155 Carryover credits

431:9A-156 Course instructors

431:9A-157 Tuition

431:9A-158 Reporting credit hours and
recordkeeping

431:9A-159 Advertising

431:9A-160 Advisory committee

ARTICLE 9B.
REINSURANCE INTERMEDIARY

431:9B-101 Definitions

431:9B-102 Licensure

431:9B-103 Required contract provisions;
reinsurance

intermediary-brokers

431:9B-104 Books and records; reinsurance

intermediary-brokers

431:9B-105 Duties of insurers utilizing the
services of

a reinsurance intermediary-broker

431:9B-106 Required contract provisions;
reinsurance

intermediary-managers

431:9B-107 Prohibited acts

431:9B-108 Duties of reinsurers utilizing the
services of

a reinsurance intermediary-manager

431:9B-109 Examination authority

431:9B-110 Penalties and liabilities

431:9B-111 Rules

ARTICLE 9C.
MANAGING GENERAL AGENTS

431:9C-101 Definitions

431:9C-102 Licensure

431:9C-103 Required contract provisions

431:9C-104 Duties of insurers

431:9C-105 Examination authority

431:9C-106 Penalties and liabilities

431:9C-107 Rules

ARTICLE 9N.
BAIL AGENTS; SURETIES

431:9N-101 Definitions

431:9N-102 License denial, nonrenewal,
suspension, or

revocation

431:9N-103 Fiduciary responsibilities

431:9N-104 Bail agent not to act as attorney

ARTICLE 10.
INSURANCE CONTRACTS GENERALLY

Part I. Readability of Insurance Contracts

431:10-101 Scope; effective dates

431:10-102 Definitions

431:10-103 Exemptions of certain contracts

431:10-104 General readability requirements

431:10-105 Required reading test; authorization
and

availability

431:10-106 Flesch reading ease test; procedures

431:10-107 Filing of certificate

431:10-108 Flesch reading ease score; lower
score

authorized; when

431:10-109 Disclosure of health care coverage
and benefits

Part II. General Rules

431:10-201 Scope

431:10-202 Definitions

431:10-203 Power to contract

431:10-204 Insurable interest required; personal
insurances

431:10-205 Interest of the insured

431:10-206 Application for insurance: consent
of insured

required

431:10-207 Alteration of application

431:10-208 Limitations on use of application as
evidence

431:10-209 Warranties, misrepresentations in
applications

431:10-210 Standard form fire insurance policy

431:10-211 Content of policies in general

431:10-211.3 Commercial general liability extended
reporting

requirements

431:10-211.5 Premium waiver provisions;
restrictions

431:10-212 Contract limitations for handicapped
children

and children with intellectual
disabilities

431:10-213 Repealed

431:10-214 Right to return policy

431:10-215 Readjustment of premiums; dividends

431:10-216 Additional contents

431:10-217 Charter, bylaw provisions

431:10-217.5 Policies relating to domestic abuse
cases

431:10-218 Stated premium must include all
charges

431:10-219 Multi-peril policies, premiums stated
separately

431:10-220 Policy must contain entire contract

431:10-221 Prohibited policy provisions:
limiting actions

and jurisdictions

431:10-222 Construction industry; indemnity
agreements

invalid

431:10-222.5 Pooled insurance

431:10-223 Underwriters and combination policies

431:10-224 Execution of policies

431:10-225 Delivery of policy

431:10-226 Renewal of policy; new policy not
required

431:10-226.5 Notice of cancellation or nonrenewal

431:10-227 Retroactive annulment of liability
policies

prohibited

431:10-228 Assignment of policies

431:10-229 Dividends payable to the real party

431:10-230 Payment discharges insurer

431:10-231 Exemption of proceeds; accident and
health or

sickness

431:10-232 Exemption of proceeds; life,
endowment and

annuity

431:10-233 Exemption of proceeds; group life

431:10-234 Spouses' and reciprocal
beneficiaries' right in

life insurance policy

431:10-235 Forms for proof of loss furnished

431:10-236 Claim administration not waiver

431:10-237 Construction of policies

431:10-238 Validity of noncomplying forms

431:10-239 Intervening breach

431:10-240 Insurance contracts; punitive damages

431:10-241 Venue in certain actions

431:10-242 Policyholder and other suits against
insurer

431:10-243 Interest upon proceeds of life
insurance policies

431:10-244 Filing procedure for contracts
approved by

commissioner

ARTICLE 10A. ACCIDENT
AND HEALTH OR SICKNESS

INSURANCE
CONTRACTS

Part I. Individual Accident and Health or
Sickness

Policies

431:10A-101 Applications and exceptions

431:10A-102 Accident and health or sickness
insurance policy

Defined

431:10A-102.5 Limited benefit health insurance

431:10A-103 Family coverage defined

431:10A-104 Form of policy

431:10A-105 Required provisions

431:10A‑105.5 Federal law compliance

431:10A-105.6 Prohibition on rescissions of
coverage

431:10A-106 Optional provisions

431:10A-107 Inapplicable or inconsistent
provisions

431:10A-108 Order of certain policy provisions

431:10A-109 Third party ownership

431:10A-110 Requirements of other jurisdictions

431:10A-111 Other policy provisions

431:10A-112 Policy conflicting with this part

431:10A-113 Filing procedure

431:10A-114 Age limit

431:10A-115 Coverage of newborn children

431:10A-115.5 Coverage for child health supervision
services

431:10A-116 Coverage for specific services

431:10A-116.2 Mammograms; referral not required

431:10A-116.3 Coverage for telehealth

431:10A-116.5 In vitro fertilization procedure
coverage

431:10A-116.6 Contraceptive services

431:10A-116.7 Contraceptive services; religious
employers

exemption

431:10A-118.3 Non-discrimination on the basis of
actual gender

identity or perceived gender
identity; coverage

for services

431:10A-119 Hospice care coverage

431:10A-120 Medical foods and low-protein
modified food

products; treatment of inborn error
of metabolism;

notice

431:10A-121 Coverage for diabetes

431:10A-122 Colon cancer screening coverage

431:10A-125 Primary care provider; advanced
practice

registered nurse

431:10A-126 Cancer treatment

431:10A-131 Repealed

431:10A-132 Orthodontic services for orofacial
anomalies;

benefits and coverage; notice

431:10A-133 Autism benefits and coverage; notice;
definitions

431:10A-134 Human immunodeficiency virus and
acquired

immunodeficiency syndrome screening
coverage

431:10A-140 Formulary; accessibility requirements

Part II. Group and Blanket Disability
Insurance

431:10A-201 Definitions

431:10A-202 Health care groups

431:10A-203 Standard provisions

431:10A-204 Optional provision, examination and
autopsy

431:10A-205 Payment of benefits

431:10A-206 Coverage of newborn children

431:10A-206.5 Coverage for child health supervision
services

431:10A-207 Coverage for specific services

431:10A-208 Qualified medical child support order

Part III. Medicare Supplement Policies

431:10A-301 Definitions

431:10A-302 Applicability and scope

431:10A-303 Repealed

431:10A-304 Standards for policy provisions

431:10A-305 Rules

431:10A-306 Loss ratio standards

431:10A-307 Disclosure standards

431:10A-308 Notice of free examination

431:10A-309 Filings; approval of forms

431:10A-310 Filing requirements for advertising

431:10A-311 Penalties

431:10A-312 Severability

Part IV. Extended Health Insurance

431:10A-401 Purpose

431:10A-402 Definitions

431:10A-403 Association of insurers;
policyholder; policy

431:10A-404 Persons authorized to transact
insurance

431:10A-404.5 Genetic information nondiscrimination
in extended

health insurance coverage

431:10A-405 Association; powers, process;
examination

431:10A-406 Forms; rates; approval

431:10A-407 Duplication of benefits; adjustment

431:10A-408 Annual report filed by association

431:10A-409 Articles of association; agent,
membership list;

deception

431:10A-410 Violation of other laws

Part V. Long-Term Care Insurance--Repealed

431:10A-521 to 531 Repealed

Part VI. Miscellaneous Provisions

431:10A-601 Reciprocal beneficiary family
coverage defined;

policyholder and employer
responsibility for

costs; availability

431:10A-602 Federally funded programs; exemption

431:10A-603 Self-employed persons, exemption

431:10A-604 Bona fide trade associations

ARTICLE 10B.
CREDIT LIFE INSURANCE

AND CREDIT
DISABILITY INSURANCE

431:10B-101 Purpose

431:10B-102 Scope

431:10B-103 Definitions

431:10B-104 Forms of credit life insurance and
credit

disability insurance

431:10B-105 Amount of credit life insurance and
credit

disability insurance

431:10B-106 Term of credit life and credit
disability

insurance

431:10B-107 Provisions of policies and
certificates of

insurance: disclosure to debtors

431:10B-108 Filing, approval, and withdrawal of
forms and

premium rates

431:10B-109 Premiums and refunds

431:10B-110 Issuance of policies

431:10B-111 Claims

431:10B-112 Existing insurance and choice of
insurer

431:10B-113 Enforcement

431:10B-114 Penalties

ARTICLE 10C.
MOTOR VEHICLE INSURANCE

Part I. General Provisions

431:10C-101 Short title

431:10C-102 Purpose

431:10C-103 Definitions

431:10C-103.5 Personal injury protection benefits;
defined;

limits

431:10C-103.6 Personal injury protection benefits
tied to

prepaid health care plan for
description of

coverage only

431:10C-104 Conditions of operation and
registration of motor

vehicles

431:10C-104.5 Repealed

431:10C-105 Self-insurance

431:10C-106 Specialty insurers not prohibited

431:10C-107 Verification of insurance: motor
vehicles

431:10C-108 Unlawful use of motor vehicle
insurance

identification card

431:10C-109 Motor vehicle insurance
identification card after

cancellation of policy; return to
insurer, civil

sanctions

431:10C-110 Rejection of application, joint
underwriting plan

placement

431:10C‑110.5 Replacing motor vehicle
insurance policy through

an insurer's affiliate or subsidiary

431:10C-111 Cancellation and nonrenewal of
policies: when

prohibited, when permitted

431:10C-111.5 Limit on nonrenewals and conditional
renewals

431:10C-112 Notice of cancellation or nonrenewal;
effect on

term of coverage

431:10C-112.5 Notice of cancellation for insurer
ceasing to

issue motor vehicle insurance
policies

431:10C-113 Violation of rejection, cancellation
and

nonrenewal provisions

431:10C-114 Insured's obligations upon
termination of

insurance

431:10C-115 Drivers education fund underwriters
fee

431:10C-115.5 Repealed

431:10C-115.6 Disclosure of personal injury
protection limits

and payments

431:10C-115.7 Plain language billings

431:10C-116 Challenges to motor vehicle insurance
law;

intervention by attorney general

431:10C-117 Penalties

431:10C-117.5 Additional civil liability

431:10C-118 Fee in lieu of fine; defense

431:10C-119 Insurer's requirements

431:10C-120 Prohibitions, penalty

431:10C-121 Severability

Part II. Rates and Administration

431:10C-201 Motor vehicle insurance rates
generally

431:10C-202 Making of motor vehicle insurance
rates

431:10C-202.5 Immediate rate freeze; rate
reduction; relief

431:10C-203 Rate filings

431:10C-204 Repealed

431:10C-205 Rate review: request by aggrieved
party

431:10C-206 Repealed

431:10C-206.5 Group insurance plans

431:10C-207 Discriminatory practices prohibited

431:10C-208 Increase in premiums prohibited

431:10C-209 Rate administration

431:10C-209.5 Repealed

431:10C-210 Publication of premium information

431:10C-211 Attorney's fees

431:10C-212 Administrative hearing on insurer's
denial of

claim

431:10C-213 Arbitration

431:10C-213.5 Binding arbitration

431:10C-214 Administration

431:10C-215 Inspection and audit

431:10C-216 Annual review

Part III. Coverages and Rights

431:10C-301 Required motor vehicle policy
coverage

431:10C-301.5 Covered loss deductible

431:10C-302 Required optional additional
insurance

431:10C-302.5 Managed care option

431:10C-303 Right to personal injury protection
benefits

431:10C-303.5 U-drive insurance policy; primary

431:10C-304 Obligation to pay personal injury
protection

benefits

431:10C-305 Source of payment

431:10C-305.5 Right to reimbursement of deductible
paid; when

431:10C-306 Abolition of tort liability

431:10C-307 Reimbursement of duplicate benefits

431:10C-307.7, 307.8 Repealed

431:10C-308 Repealed

431:10C-308.5 Limitation on charges

431:10C-308.6 Repealed

431:10C-308.7 Client-patient referrals, health care
provider

practices prohibited

431:10C-309 Total loss motor vehicle claims

431:10C-310 Total loss motor vehicle claims:
replacement

431:10C-311 Total loss motor vehicle claims:
cash settlement

431:10C-312 Payment of excise tax and certificate
of

ownership fee

431:10C-313 Insurer practices regarding loss of
use, storage

and towing, and betterment

431:10C-313.5 Preferred repair provider

431:10C-313.6 Original equipment manufacturer's and
like kind

and quality parts

431:10C-314 Jurisdiction

431:10C-315 Statute of limitations

Part IV. Joint Underwriting Plan

Subpart A. Participation and
Administration

431:10C-401 Participation

431:10C-402 Bureau

431:10C-403 Bureau's duties

431:10C-404 Allocation of costs

431:10C-405 Board of governors

431:10C-406 Regulations, review, and appellate
procedure

Subpart B. Coverages and Assignment of
Claims

431:10C-407 Classifications

431:10C-408 Assigned claims

Subpart C. Rates

431:10C-409 Establishment and criteria

431:10C-410 Schedules

431:10C-411 Optional additional coverages

431:10C-412 Adjustment and refund

Part V. Motorcycles and Motor
Scooters--Repealed

431:10C-501 to 504 Repealed

Part VI. Self-Insurer Requirements

431:10C-601 Agreement

431:10C-602 Surety bond or deposit of security;
proof

of financial ability

431:10C-603 Proof of ability to process and pay
claims

promptly

431:10C-604 Issuance of certificate of
self-insurance

431:10C-605 Duty to notify commissioner

431:10C-606 Duration of certification

431:10C-607 Revocation of certificate of
self-insurance

431:10C-608 Termination of self-insurer status
and

withdrawal of security deposit

ARTICLE 10C. MOTOR
VEHICLE INSURANCE

Part I. General Provisions

431:10C-107 Verification of insurance: motor vehicles

Part VII. Transportation Network Companies

431:10C-701 Definitions

431:10C-702 Relation to other laws

431:10C-703 Transportation network company and
transportation

network company driver; disclosure; limitations;

insurance requirements

431:10C-704 Records

431:10C-705 Disclaimers, waiver of liability, and indemnity

agreements invalid

ARTICLE 10D.
LIFE INSURANCE AND ANNUITIES

Part I. Individual Life Insurance,
Annuities and Pure

Endowment Contracts

431:10D-101 Scope

431:10D-102 Standard provisions required

431:10D-103 Policy loan interest rates for
policies issued

after June 22, 1982

431:10D-104 Standard nonforfeiture law for life
insurance

431:10D-105 Annuities and pure endowment
contracts; standard

provisions required

431:10D-106 Reversionary annuities; standard
provisions

required

431:10D-107 Standard nonforfeiture law;
individual deferred

annuities

431:10D-108 Limitation of liability

431:10D-109 Scope of incontestable clauses

431:10D-110 Incontestability after reinstatement

431:10D-111 Premium deposits

431:10D-112 Policy settlements

431:10D-113 Indebtedness deducted from proceeds

431:10D-114 Miscellaneous proceeds

431:10D-115 Dealing in dividends

431:10D-116 Prohibited policy plans

431:10D-117 Life franchise plan

431:10D-118 Variable contracts

Part II. Group Life Insurance

431:10D-201 Group life insurance requirements

431:10D-202 Employee groups

431:10D-203 Debtor groups

431:10D-204 Labor union groups

431:10D-205 Trustee groups

431:10D-206 Agent groups

431:10D-207 Public employee association groups

431:10D-208 Mutual benefit society groups

431:10D-209 Professional association groups

431:10D-210 Occupation, industry, or trade
association groups

431:10D-211 Credit union groups

431:10D-211.5 Other groups; limits

431:10D-212 Spouses and dependents of insured
individuals

431:10D-213 Standard provisions required

431:10D-214 Notice to insured regarding
conversion right

431:10D-215 Assignment of policies

Part III. Industrial Life Insurance

431:10D-301 Scope

431:10D-302 General life insurance provisions
applicable

431:10D-303 Industrial life insurance defined

431:10D-304 Compliance required

431:10D-305 Standard provisions required

431:10D-306 Title on policy

431:10D-307 Beneficiary

431:10D-308 Facility of payment

431:10D-309 Premiums paid direct

431:10D-310 Application to term and specified
insurance

431:10D-311 Crediting of dividends

431:10D-312 Prohibited provisions

431:10D-313 Limitation of liability

Part IV. Life Insurance Policy
Illustrations

431:10D-401 Scope

431:10D-402 Definitions

431:10D-403 Policies to be illustrated

431:10D-404 General requirements and prohibitions

431:10D-405 Standards for basic illustrations

431:10D-406 Standards for supplemental
illustrations

431:10D-407 Delivery of illustration and record

retention

431:10D-408 Annual reports and notice to policy
owners

431:10D-409 Annual certifications

431:10D-410 Penalties

431:10D-411 Authority to adopt rules

431:10D-412 Repealed

Part V. Replacement of Life Insurance

Policies and Annuities

431:10D-501 Purpose and scope

431:10D-502 Definitions

431:10D-503 Duties of producers

431:10D-504 Duties of insurers that use producers

431:10D-505 Duties of replacing insurers that use

producers

431:10D-506 Duties of the existing insurer

431:10D-507 Duties of insurers with respect to

direct-response solicitations

431:10D-508 Violations and penalties

431:10D-509 Authority to adopt rules

431:10D-510 Repealed

ARTICLE 10D.
LIFE INSURANCE AND ANNUITIES

Part VI. Annuity Disclosure

431:10D-601 Definitions

431:10D-602 Applicability of standards for
disclosure

431:10D-603 Standards for the disclosure document
and buyer's

guide

431:10D-604 Report to contract owners

431:10D-605 Penalties

Part VII. Suitability in Annuity
Transactions

431:10D-621 Scope

431:10D-622 Definitions

431:10D-623 Duties of insurers and insurance
producers

431:10D-624 Compliance mitigation; penalties

431:10D-625 Recordkeeping

431:10D-626 Insurance producer training

Part VIII.
Use of Senior-Specific Certifications

and Professional Designations

431:10D-641 Purpose

431:10D-642 Prohibited uses of senior-specific
certifications

and professional designations

ARTICLE 10E.
PROPERTY INSURANCE

Part I. Insurable Interest in Property;

Over-Insurance

431:10E-101 Insurable interest in property
required

431:10E-102 Over-insurance prohibited; exceptions

431:10E-103 Exceptions

Part II. Homeowners Insurance Claims
History

431:10E-121 Purpose

431:10E-122 Scope; effective dates

431:10E-123 Definitions

431:10E-124 Use of inquiries and other
information

Part III. Lava Zones

431:10E-141 Lava zone defined

431:10E-142 Provisions for properties in lava
zones in the

county of Hawaii

ARTICLE 10E. PROPERTY
INSURANCE

Part IV. Coverages

431:10E-151 Notice requirement

431:10E-152 Extended coverage

ARTICLE 10F.
SURETY INSURANCE

431:10F-101 Requirements deemed met by surety
insurer

431:10F-102 Fiduciary bonds, expense

431:10F-103 Court bonds, costs

431:10F-104 Release from liability

431:10F-105 Directed suretyship; coercion of
contractors

ARTICLE 10G.
MOTORCYCLE AND MOTOR SCOOTER INSURANCE

Part I. General Provisions

431:10G-101 Definitions

431:10G-102 Conditions of operation and
registration of

motorcycles and motor scooters

431:10G-103 Motorcycle or motor scooter
self-insurance

431:10G-104 Prerequisites for obtaining coverage

431:10G-105 Tort liability

431:10G-106 Verification of insurance

431:10G-107 Drivers education fund underwriters
fee;

motorcycle and motor scooter
operators education

fund

431:10G-108 Penalties

431:10G-109 Rules

Part II. Rates and Administration

431:10G-201 Making of motorcycle and motor
scooter insurance

rates

431:10G-202 Rate filings

431:10G-203 Rate review: request by aggrieved
party

431:10G-204 Rate review: rate methods in
noncompliance with

article

431:10G-206 Rate administration

Part III. Coverages and Rights

431:10G-301 Required motorcycle and motor scooter
policy

coverage

ARTICLE 10H.
LONG-TERM CARE INSURANCE

Part I. Long-Term Care Insurance Model Act

431:10H-101 Purpose

431:10H-102 Scope

431:10H-103 Short title

431:10H-104 Definitions

431:10H-105 Extraterritorial jurisdiction; group
policies

431:10H-106 Rules

431:10H-106.5 Producer training requirements

431:10H-107 Basic standards

431:10H-108 Preexisting conditions--group and
individual

policies

431:10H-109 Prior hospitalization; prior
institutionalization

431:10H-110 Loss ratio standards; factors;
commissioner

approval

431:10H-111 Right to return; free look provision

431:10H-112 Outline of coverage required

431:10H-113 Group policy certificate requirements

431:10H-114 Life insurance policies offering
long-term care

benefits

431:10H-115 Incontestability period--group and
individual

policies

431:10H-116 Nonforfeiture benefits

431:10H-116.5 Delivery of the contract or
certificate of

insurance

431:10H-116.6 Denial of claims; compliance
requirements

431:10H-117 Authority to adopt rules

Part II. Long-Term Care Insurance Model
Regulation

431:10H-201 Policy definitions

431:10H-202 Renewability

431:10H-202.5 Licensing

431:10H-203 Limitations and exclusions

431:10H-204 Extension of benefits

431:10H-204.5 Electronic enrollment for group
policies

431:10H-205 Continuation or conversion

431:10H-206 Discontinuance and replacement

431:10H-207 Premiums charged--group and
individual policies

431:10H-207.5 Premium rate schedule increases

431:10H-208 Unintentional lapse

431:10H-209 Lapse or termination for nonpayment
of premium

431:10H-210 Reinstatement

431:10H-211 Disclosure; renewability

431:10H-212 Disclosure; riders and endorsements

431:10H-213 Disclosure; payment of benefits

431:10H-214 Disclosure; limitations

431:10H-215 Disclosure; other limitations and
conditions on

eligibility for benefits

431:10H-216 Disclosure of tax consequences

431:10H-217 Disclosure; benefit triggers

431:10H-217.5 Required disclosure of rating
practices to

consumers

431:10H-218 Prohibition against post-claims
underwriting

431:10H-219 Minimum standards for home health and
community

care benefits

431:10H-220 Requirement to offer inflation
protection; group

and individual policies

431:10H-221 Requirements for application forms
and replacement

coverage

431:10H-222 Reporting requirements

431:10H-223 Discretionary powers of the
commissioner

431:10H-224 Reserve standards; life insurance policies
or

riders

431:10H-225 Reserve standards; insurance other
than life

431:10H-226 Loss ratio

431:10H-226.5 Initial filing requirements

431:10H-227 Filing requirements; extraterritorial

431:10H-228 Filing requirements; advertisements

431:10H-229 Standards for marketing

431:10H-230 Standards of marketing--certain group
policies

431:10H-231 Suitability

431:10H-232 Prohibition against preexisting
conditions and

probationary periods in replacement
policies and

certificates

431:10H-233 Nonforfeiture benefit requirement

431:10H-234 Standards for benefit triggers

431:10H-234.5 Additional standards for benefit
triggers for

qualified long-term care insurance
contracts

431:10H-235 Standard format outline of coverage;
group and

individual policies

431:10H-236 Delivery of shopper's guide; group
and individual

policies

431:10H-237 Penalties

Part III. Federal Conformity

431:10H-301 Group long-term care insurance
policies

conformance to Health Insurance
Portability and

Accountability Act and Internal
Revenue Code

431:10H-302 Individual long-term care insurance
policy

coverages

431:10H-303 Conflict with Health Insurance
Portability and

Accountability Act

431:10H-304 Disclosure of qualification for tax
benefits

Part IV. Universal Availability of
Long-Term Care

Insurance

431:10H-401 Publicizing of policies

431:10H-402 Purchase of policy and payment of
premiums on an

individual's behalf

ARTICLE 11.
INSURANCE HOLDING COMPANY SYSTEM

431:11-101 Scope and purpose

431:11-102 Definitions

431:11-103 Subsidiaries of insurers

431:11-104 Acquisition of control or merger with
domestic

insurer

431:11-104.1 Definitions

431:11-104.2 Scope

431:11-104.3 Preacquisition notification; waiting
period

431:11-104.4 Competitive standard

431:11-104.5 Orders and penalties

431:11-104.6 Inapplicable provisions

431:11-105 Registration of insurers

431:11-106 Standards and management of an
insurer within a

holding company system

431:11-107 Examination

431:11-107.5 Supervisory colleges

431:11-108 Confidential treatment

431:11-109 Rules and regulations

431:11-110 Injunctions; prohibitions against
voting

securities; sequestration of voting
securities

431:11-111 Sanctions

431:11-112 Receivership

431:11-113 Recovery

431:11-114 Revocation, suspension, or nonrenewal
of

insurer's license

431:11-115 Judicial review; mandamus

431:11-116 Conflict with other laws

431:11-117 Severability of provisions

ARTICLE 11A.
BUSINESS TRANSACTED WITH PRODUCER

CONTROLLED
PROPERTY/CASUALTY INSURER

431:11A-101 Definitions

431:11A-102 Applicability

431:11A-103 Minimum standards

431:11A-104 Disclosure

431:11A-105 Penalties

ARTICLE 12.
MASS MERCHANDISING OF INSURANCE

431:12-101 Definitions

431:12-102 Applicability

431:12-103 Mass merchandising authorized

431:12-104 Mass merchandising prohibited; when

431:12-105 Mass merchandising requirements

431:12-106 Disclosure

431:12-107 Payroll deductions and premium
collections

431:12-108 Employer's failure to remit premiums

431:12-109 Cancellation and nonrenewal

431:12-110 Premium rates

431:12-111 Readjustment of premiums; dividends

431:12-112 Underwriting standards

431:12-113 Statistics

431:12-114 Licenses

431:12-115 Establishment and maintenance of
office

431:12-116 Rules

ARTICLE 13.
UNFAIR METHODS OF COMPETITION AND

UNFAIR AND
DECEPTIVE ACTS AND PRACTICES IN

THE BUSINESS
OF INSURANCE

Part I. General Provisions

431:13-101 Purpose

431:13-102 Unfair methods of competition; unfair
or

deceptive acts or practices
prohibited

431:13-103 Unfair methods of competition and
unfair or

deceptive acts or practices defined

431:13-104 Favored producer or insurer; coercion
of debtors

431:13-105 Power of commissioner

431:13-106 Hearings

431:13-107 Commissioner's right of action

431:13-108 Reimbursement for accident and health
or sickness

insurance benefits

Part II. Penalties and Judicial Review

431:13-201 Cease and desist and penalty orders;
judicial

review

431:13-202 Penalty for violation of cease and
desist orders

431:13-203 Rules

431:13-204 Provisions of sections additional to
existing

laws

ARTICLE 14.
RATE REGULATION

Part I. Casualty, Surety, Property, Marine
and

Transportation Rate Regulation

431:14-101 Purpose

431:14-101.5 Definitions

431:14-102 Scope

431:14-103 Making of rates

431:14-103.3 Rate adjustment mandates

431:14-103.5 Contracting classification premium
program

431:14-104 Rate filings

431:14-104.5 Loss cost filings

431:14-105 Policy revisions that alter coverage

431:14-105.5 Standing to intervene in rate filing
and

ratemaking proceedings

431:14-106 Disapproval of filings

431:14-107 Rating organizations

431:14-107.1 Rating and advisory organizations,
permitted

activity

431:14-107.2 Insurers and organizations,
prohibited activity

431:14-107.3 Rating or advisory organizations,
prohibited

activity

431:14-108 Deviations

431:14-109 Appeal by minority

431:14-110 Information to be furnished insureds;
hearings

and appeals of insureds

431:14-110.5 Disclosure of workers' compensation
premium

information

431:14-110.8 Publication of homeowners insurance
premium

information

431:14-111 Advisory organizations

431:14-112 Joint underwriting or joint
reinsurance

431:14-113 Examination

431:14-114 Rate administration

431:14-115 False or misleading information

431:14-116 Assigned risks

431:14-116.5 Assigned risk pool; experience rating
plan

431:14-116.6 Assigned risk pool; residual market
plan

431:14-117 Penalties

431:14-118 Hearing procedure and judicial review

431:14-119 Repealed

431:14-120 Additional powers for workers'
compensation rate

filing and ratemaking

ARTICLE 14A. HAWAII
EMPLOYERS' MUTUAL INSURANCE COMPANY

431:14A-101 Purpose

431:14A-102 Definitions

431:14A-103 Hawaii employers' mutual insurance
company,

established

431:14A-104 Company divisions

431:14A-105 Board of directors, established

431:14A-106 Powers; generally

431:14A-107 Duties and responsibilities

431:14A-108 Administrator; appointment; duties

431:14A-109 Financial management

431:14A-109.5 Oversight council

431:14A-110 Premium rates, determination

431:14A-111 Reserves, investment

431:14A-112 Financial statements and other
reports

431:14A-113 Annual accounting; dividends

431:14A-114 Audits

431:14A-115 Denial, cancellation, and termination

431:14A-116 Wilful misrepresentation and fraud

431:14A-117 Workplace safety and health programs

431:14A-118 Discontinuation of residual market
plan

431:14A-119 Discontinuation of assigned risks

ARTICLE 14F.
HEALTH INSURANCE RATE REGULATION--REPEALED

431:14F-101 to 113 Repealed

ARTICLE 14G. HEALTH
INSURANCE RATE REGULATION

431:14G-101 Scope and purpose

431:14G-102 Definitions

431:14G-103 Making of rates

431:14G-103.5 Rerating

431:14G-104 Rate adjustment mandates

431:14G-105 Rate filings

431:14G-106 Policy revisions that alter coverage

431:14G-107 Disapproval of filings

431:14G-108 Managed care plans; prohibited
activity

431:14G-109 Information to be furnished
enrollees; hearings

and appeals of enrollees

431:14G-109.5 Publication of premium information

431:14G-110 False or misleading information

431:14G-111 Penalties

431:14G-112 Hearing procedure and judicial review

ARTICLE 15.
INSURERS SUPERVISION, REHABILITATION

AND
LIQUIDATION

Part I. General Provisions

431:15-101 Construction and purpose

431:15-102 Persons covered

431:15-103 Definitions

431:15-103.5 Standards and authority

431:15-104 Jurisdiction and venue

431:15-105 Injunctions and orders

431:15-106 Cooperation of officers and employees

431:15-107 Commissioner's reports

431:15-108 Continuation of delinquency
proceedings

Part II. Summary Proceedings and
Supervisory

Proceedings

431:15-201 Commissioner's summary orders and
supervision

proceedings

431:15-202 Court's seizure order

431:15-203 Confidentiality of hearings

Part III. Formal Proceedings

431:15-301 Grounds for rehabilitation

431:15-302 Rehabilitation orders

431:15-303 Powers and duties of the
rehabilitator

431:15-304 Actions by and against rehabilitator

431:15-305 Termination of rehabilitation

431:15-306 Grounds for liquidation

431:15-307 Liquidation orders

431:15-308 Continuance of coverage

431:15-309 Dissolution of insurer

431:15-310 Powers of liquidator

431:15-311 Notice to creditors and others

431:15-312 Duties of producers

431:15-313 Actions by and against liquidator

431:15-314 Collection and list of assets

431:15-315 Fraudulent transfers prior to
petition

431:15-316 Fraudulent transfer after petition

431:15-317 Voidable preferences and liens

431:15-318 Claims of holders of void or voidable
rights

431:15-319 Setoffs and counterclaims

431:15-320 Assessments

431:15-321 Reinsurer's liability

431:15-322 Applicability of claims settlement
provisions to

loss claims

431:15-323 Recovery of premiums owed

431:15-324 Domiciliary liquidator's proposal to
distribute

assets

431:15-325 Filing of claims

431:15-326 Proof of claim

431:15-327 Special claims

431:15-328 Provisions for third party claims

431:15-329 Disputed claims

431:15-330 Claims of surety

431:15-331 Secured creditor's claims

431:15-332 Priority of distribution

431:15-333 Liquidator's recommendations to the
court

431:15-334 Distribution of assets

431:15-335 Unclaimed and withheld funds

431:15-336 Termination of proceedings

431:15-337 Reopening liquidation

431:15-338 Disposition of records during and
after

termination of liquidation

Part IV. Interstate Relations

431:15-401 Conservation of property of foreign
or alien

insurers found in this State

431:15-402 Liquidation of property of foreign or
alien

insurers found in this State

431:15-403 Domiciliary liquidators in other
states

431:15-404 Ancillary formal proceedings

431:15-405 Ancillary summary proceedings

431:15-406 Claims of nonresidents against
insurers domiciled

in this State

431:15-407 Claims of residents against insurers
domiciled in

reciprocal states

431:15-408 Attachment, garnishment and levy of
execution

431:15-409 Interstate priorities

431:15-410 Subordination of claims for
noncooperation

431:15-411 Separability

ARTICLE 16.
GUARANTY ASSOCIATIONS

Part I. Property and Liability Insurance
Guaranty

Association

431:16-101 Title

431:16-102 Purpose

431:16-103 Scope

431:16-104 Construction

431:16-105 Definitions

431:16-106 Creation of association

431:16-107 Board of directors

431:16-108 Powers and duties of the association

431:16-109 Plan of operation

431:16-110 Duties and powers of the commissioner

431:16-111 Effect of paid claims

431:16-112 Exhaustion of other coverage

431:16-113 Prevention of insolvencies

431:16-114 Tax exemption

431:16-115 Recoupment of assessment

431:16-116 Immunity

431:16-117 Stay of proceedings

Part II. Life and Disability Insurance
Guaranty

Association

431:16-201 Title

431:16-202 Purpose

431:16-203 Coverage and limitations

431:16-204 Construction

431:16-205 Definitions

431:16-206 Creation of the association

431:16-207 Board of directors

431:16-208 Powers and duties of the association

431:16-209 Assessments

431:16-210 Plan of operation

431:16-211 Duties and powers of the commissioner

431:16-212 Prevention of insolvencies

431:16-213 Credits for assessments paid

431:16-214 Miscellaneous provisions

431:16-215 Tax exemptions

431:16-216 Immunity

431:16-217 Stay of proceedings; reopening
default

judgments

431:16-218 Prohibited advertisement of association
act in

insurance sales; notice to
policyholders

431:16-219 Repealed

ARTICLE 17.
INSURANCE INFORMATION PROTECTION ACT--REPEALED

431:17-101 to 106 Repealed

ARTICLE 18.
[RESERVED]

ARTICLE 19.
CAPTIVE INSURANCE COMPANIES

Part I. General Provisions

431:19-101 Definitions

431:19-101.2 Confidential treatment

431:19-101.3 Repealed

431:19-101.4 Service providers

431:19-101.5 Captive insurance administrator

431:19-101.6 Salary

431:19-101.7 General powers and duties

431:19-101.8 Captive insurance administrative fund

431:19-102 Certificate of authority

431:19-102.2 Personal lines insurance

431:19-102.3 Redomestication; approval as a
domestic captive

insurer

431:19-102.4 Redomestication; conversion to
foreign insurer

431:19-102.5 Repealed

431:19-103 Names of companies

431:19-104 Minimum capital and surplus

431:19-105 Repealed

431:19-106 Formation of captive insurance
companies in

this State

431:19-106.3 Repealed

431:19-106.5 Conversion or merger of captive
insurers

431:19-107 Financial statements and other
reports

431:19-108 Examinations, investigations, and
financial

surveillance

431:19-109 Grounds and procedures for suspension
and

revocation of certificate of
authority; fines

431:19-110 Investments

431:19-111 Reinsurance

431:19-111.5 Class 5 companies

431:19-112 Rating organizations; memberships

431:19-113 Exemption from compulsory associations

431:19-114 Rules

431:19-115 Laws applicable

431:19-115.5 Applicability of other laws to
captive insurance

companies writing motor vehicle
insurance

policies in this State

431:19-115.6 Applicability of other laws to
captive insurance

companies writing credit life or
other credit

disability insurance policies

431:19-115.7 Applicability of other laws to
captive

insurance companies writing direct
workers'

compensation insurance policies

431:19-116 Taxation

Part II. Special Purpose Financial
Captive

Insurance Companies

431:19-201 Purpose

431:19-202 Applicable law

431:19-203 Definitions

431:19-204 Certificate of authority

431:19-205 Changes in plan of operation;
voluntary

dissolution or cessation of business

431:19-206 Formation

431:19-207 Minimum capital and surplus

431:19-208 Issuance of securities

431:19-209 Authorized contracts and agreements

431:19-210 Disposition of assets; investments

431:19-211 Annual reporting; books and records

431:19-212 Suspension and revocation of
certificate of

authority

431:19-213 Supervision, rehabilitation,
liquidation

431:19-214 Existing licenses

Part III. Sponsored Captive Insurance
Companies

431:19-301 Formation

431:19-302 Supplemental application materials

431:19-303 Protected cells

431:19-304 Qualification of sponsors

431:19-305 Participants in sponsored captive
insurance

companies

431:19-306 Investments by sponsored captive
insurance

companies

431:19-307 Delinquency of sponsored captive
insurance

companies

431:19-308 Applicable laws

431:19-309 Existing licenses

ARTICLE 20.
TITLE INSURANCE AND TITLE INSURERS

431:20-101 Scope

431:20-102 Definitions

431:20-103 General insurance law applicable

431:20-104 Particular provisions prevail

431:20-105 Authorized business

431:20-106 Restrictions on business

431:20-106.5 Escrow depositories

431:20-107 Capital requirements

431:20-108 Guarantee fund

431:20-109 Limitations on compliance with
section 431:20-107

and section 431:20-108

431:20-110 Purchase of materials and plant;
valuation

431:20-110.5 Dividends

431:20-111 Loans to officers, etc.

431:20-112 Limit of risk

431:20-113 Underwriting standards and record
retention

431:20-114 Reinsurance reserve

431:20-115 Use of reinsurance reserve on
liquidation,

dissolution or insolvency

431:20-116 Loss and loss expense reserve

431:20-117 Reinsurance

431:20-118 Prohibition on rebates and
inducements

431:20-119 Division of fees

431:20-120 Schedules of premiums and charges

431:20-121 Contract forms, filing, disapproval

431:20-122 Annual statement

431:20-123 Remedies

431:20-124 Additional penalty

431:20-125 Revocation or suspension of title
insurer's

certificate of authority

ARTICLE 21. HAWAII PROPERTY INSURANCE ASSOCIATION

431:21-101 Purpose

431:21-102 Definitions

431:21-103 Creation of association

431:21-104 Board of directors

431:21-105 Powers and duties of the association

431:21-105.5 Default in payment of assessments

431:21-106 Plan of operation

431:21-107 Designation of area

431:21-108 Renewals of existing policies

431:21-109 Insurance coverages available under
plan

431:21-110 Application; inspection

431:21-111 Duties and powers of the commissioner

431:21-112 Reports

431:21-113 Appeals

431:21-114 Tax exemptions

431:21-115 Credits for assessments paid

431:21-116 Examination

431:21-117 Immunity and limitation on liability

431:21-118 Status of association policies

431:21-119 Issuance of new policies; removal of
moratorium

ARTICLE 22.
LOSS MITIGATION GRANT PROGRAM

431:22-101 Definitions

431:22-102 Repealed

431:22-103 Establishment of loss mitigation
grant program

431:22-104 Standards for the award of grants

431:22-105 Technical advisory committee

ARTICLE 30.
INTERSTATE INSURANCE PRODUCT REGULATION COMPACT

431:30-101 Scope

431:30-102 Definitions

431:30-103 Establishment of the commission and
venue

431:30-104 Powers of the commission

431:30-105 Repealed

431:30-106 Membership; voting; bylaws

431:30-107 Management committee; officers and
personnel

431:30-108 Legislative and advisory committees

431:30-109 Corporate records of the commission

431:30-110 Qualified immunity; defense;
indemnification

431:30-111 Meetings and acts of the commission

431:30-112 Rules and operating procedures;
rulemaking

functions of the commission and
rejection of

uniform standards

431:30-113 Commission records and enforcement

431:30-114 Dispute resolution

431:30-115 Product filing and approval

431:30-116 Review of commission decisions
regarding product

filings

431:30-117 Finance

431:30-118 Compacting states; effective date;
amendment

431:30-119 Withdrawal

431:30-120 Default

431:30-121 Dissolution of compact

431:30-122 Severability and construction

431:30-123 Other laws

431:30-124 Binding effect of the compact

ARTICLE 31.
PORTABLE ELECTRONICS INSURANCE

431:31-101 Definitions

431:31-102 Licensure of vendors

431:31-103 Requirements for sale of portable
electronics

insurance

431:31-104 Authority of vendors

431:31-105 Sanctions for violations

431:31-106 Termination or modification of
portable

electronics insurance

431:31-107 Application for license and fees

431:31-108 Portable electronics insurance claims

Cross References

Civil relief for state military forces, see chapter 657D.

Hawaii health authority, see chapter 322H.

Health care provider network adequacy, see chapter 432F.

Medicaid contracts; nonprofit and for-profit reporting
requirements, see §103F-107.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next